tests/verbs.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../tyv.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../tyv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "Past -GAн":
    кел<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : келген
    бер<v><tv><past><p3><sg> : берген
    көр<v><tv><past><p3><sg> : көрген
    уш<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : ушкан

 "Negative past -BA-GAn":
    көр<v><tv><neg><past><p3><sg> : көрбээн
    бар<v><iv><neg><past><p3><sg> : барбаан 
    ал<v><tv><neg><past><p3><sg> : албаан

 "[twol] Past in -GAн after vowels":
    бижи<v><tv><past><p3><sg> : бижээн
    уду<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : удаан
    хады<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : хадаан
    неге<v><tv><past><p3><sg> : негээн
    төрү<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : төрээн

 "Past -DI": 
    бер<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : бердим 
    көр<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : көрдүм
    уду<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : удудум
    бер<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : бердим 
    уш<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : уштум
    чор<v><iv><ifi><p3><sg> : чорду

 "Aorist -Aр [consonant stems]":
    эрт<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : эртер
    корт<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : коргар
    шап<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : шавар

 "Aorist -Iр [stems in -р, р deletion]":
    бар<vaux><aor><p3><sg> : баар
    бер<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : бээр
    көр<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : көөр
    чор<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : чор

 "Aorist -Aр [stems in -р, no р deletion]":
    кир<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : кирер
    чору<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : чоруур

 "Aorist -Iр/-Aр [stems in -л, л variable deletion]":
    кел<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : [кээр, келир]
    бол<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : [боор, болур]
    ал<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : [аар, алыр]

 "Aorist -Iр/-Aр [stems in -л, л deletion]":
    эккел<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : эккээр

 "Aorist -Iр/-Aр [stems in -л, no л deletion]":
    бил<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : билир
    кыл<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : кылыр
    чел<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : челер 

 "Aorist -Aр/-Iр [stems in -й]":
    чай<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : чаяр
    өй<v><TD><aor><p3><sg> : өер
    мөгей<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : мөгеер

 "Aorist -Aр/-Iр [stems in -г]":
    уг<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : уур
    дег<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : дээр
    чаг<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : чаар
    шүг<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : шүүр
    чуг<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : чуур
    каг<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : каар
    даг<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : даар
    эг<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : ээр

 "Aorist -Aр/-Iр [stems with epenthetic vowel]":
    ужул<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : уштур
    чедиш<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : четчир
    кириш<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : киржир
    куюс<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : куйзур
    чалын<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : чанныр
    хайын<v><TD><aor><p3><sg> : хайныр
    ажын<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : аштыр
    сөгүл<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : сөктүр
    айыт<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : айтыр
    тулуш<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : тулчур
    болуш<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : болчур
    сезин<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : сестир

 "Imperative [stems with epenthetic vowel]":
    ужул<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : ужул
    чедиш<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : чедиш
    кириш<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : кириш
    куюс<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : куюс
    чалын<v><iv><imp><p2><sg> : чалын
    хайын<v><TD><imp><p2><sg> : хайын
    ажын<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : ажын
    сөгүл<v><iv><imp><p2><sg> : сөгүл
    айыт<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : айыт
    тулуш<v><iv><imp><p2><sg> : тулуш
    болуш<v><iv><imp><p2><sg> : болуш
    сезин<v><iv><imp><p2><sg> : сезин
    одун<v><iv><imp><p2><sg> : одун

 "Aorist -Aр/-Iр [stems with epenthetic consonant]":
    соол<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : соглур
    шаш<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : шанчар
    сагын<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : сактыр
    чыыл<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : чыглыр

 "Aorist -Aр/-Iр [vowel stems]":
    ажылда<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : ажылдаар
    ойна<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : ойнаар
    чору<vaux><aor><p3><sg> : чоруур
    бүзүре<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : бүзүрээр
    иште<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : иштээр
    ынакшы<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : ынакшыыр 
    ижээ<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : ижээр
    хою<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : хоюур
    уду<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : удуур
    чи<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : чиир

 "Participle -Iп":
    ал<v><tv><prc_perf> : ап
    бол<v><iv><prc_perf> : болуп
    бол<v><iv><prc_perf> : бооп
    кел<v><iv><prc_perf> : кээп
    ойна<v><iv><prc_perf> : ойнап
    бер<v><tv><prc_perf> : берип
    бил<v><tv><prc_perf> : билип
    шап<v><tv><prc_perf> : шаап
    өскерт<v><tv><prc_perf> : өскертип
    арт<v><tv><prc_perf> : артып
    чи<v><tv><prc_perf> : чип
    айыт<v><tv><prc_perf> : айтып
    эккел<v><tv><prc_perf> : эккеп
    эг<v><iv><prc_perf> : ээп
    одун<v><iv><prc_perf> : оттуп
    кывыс<v><tv><prc_perf> : кыпсып
    сок<v><tv><prc_perf> : соп

 "Participle -Е":
    кир<v><iv><prc_impf> : кире
    бижи<v><tv><prc_impf> : бижий
    ойна<v><tv><prc_impf> : ойнай
    олур<vaux><prc_impf> : олура
    тай<v><iv><prc_impf> : тая

 "Form in -IптAр":
   четтик<v><iv><perf><p3><sg> : четтигиптер

 "Imperative -AAлI":
   саг<v><tv><imp><p1><du> : саалы
   ал<v><tv><imp><p1><du> : алыылы
   кел<v><iv><imp><p1><du> : келиили

 "Imperative -Iйн":
   кел<v><iv><imp><p1><sg> : келийн
   номчу<v><tv><imp><p1><sg> : номчууйн
   ал<v><tv><imp><p1><sg> : алыйн
   кыл<v><tv><imp><p1><sg> : кылыйн

 "Negative imperatives -BA-Iйн":
   ал<v><tv><neg><imp><p1><sg> : албайн
   исте<v><tv><neg><imp><p1><sg> : истевейн

 "Imperative -Айн":
   көр<vaux><imp><p1><sg> : көрейн
   көр<v><tv><imp><p1><sg> : көрейн
   бер<vaux><imp><p1><sg> : берейн
   бер<v><tv><imp><p1><sg> : берейн
   бар<v><iv><imp><p1><sg> : барайн
   тур<v><iv><imp><p1><sg> : турайн
   чет<v><tv><imp><p1><sg> : чедейн
   көргүс<v><tv><imp><p1><sg> : көргүзейн
   четтир<v><tv><imp><p1><sg> : четтирейн
   чорут<v><tv><imp><p1><sg> : чорудайн

 "Imperative -AAлIңAр":
   кел<v><iv><imp><p1><pl> : келиилиңер

 "Imperative -IңAр":
   бер<v><tv><imp><p2><pl> : бериңер

 "Unaccomplished -gAлAк": 
   доос<v><tv><unac><p1><sg> : дооскалаам
   доос<v><tv><unac><p3><sg> : дооскалак
